North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 2. Meetings and Action of the Board.

§ 55-8-20.
Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this State.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or the board of directors, any or all directors may participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, special meetings of the board of directors may be called by the president or any two directors.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 8; 1969, c. 751, s. 12; 1973, c. 469, ss. 8-10; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 7.

§ 55-8-21.
Action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by this Chapter to be taken at a board of directors’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. The action must be evidenced by one or more unrevoked written consents signed by each director before or after such action, describing the action taken, and included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records. To the extent the corporation has agreed pursuant to

G.S. 55-1-50

, a director’s consent to action taken without meeting or revocation thereof may be in electronic form and delivered by electronic means.

Action taken under this section is effective when one or more unrevoked consents signed by all of the directors are delivered to the corporation, unless the consents specify a different effective date. A director’s consent to action may be revoked in a writing signed by the director and delivered to the corporation prior to the action becoming effective.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 8; 1969, c. 751, s. 12; 1973, c. 469, ss. 8-10; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-387, s. 15; 2005-268, s. 9.

§ 55-8-22.
Notice of meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

Special meetings of the board of directors shall be held upon such notice as is provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or in the absence of any such provision, upon notice sent by any usual means of communication not less than five days before the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 12; 1973, c. 469, s. 8; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-23.
Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (b), the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to him of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 12; 1973, c. 469, s. 8; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-24.
Quorum and voting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a greater or lesser number or unless otherwise expressly provided in this Chapter, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the number of directors specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The quorum of the board of directors provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall not consist of less than one-third of the number of directors specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors or unless otherwise expressly provided in this Chapter.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee or subcommittee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless any of the following requirements are met:

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director’s arrival, to holding it or transacting business at the meeting.

The director’s dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting.

The director files written notice of the director’s dissent or abstention with the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or with the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

History.

Code, s. 681; 1901, c. 2, ss. 33, 52; Rev., s. 1192; C.S., s. 1179; 1927, c. 121; 1933, c. 354, s. 1; G.S., s. 55-116; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 35; 1969, c. 751, s. 12; 1973, c. 469, s. 8; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 8; 2021-106, s. 3(a).

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

In the absence of a provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a quorum is a majority of the total number of directors specified (
e.g.,
“the number of directors shall be X”) in or fixed (

e.g.,

“the number of directors shall be not less than Y or more than Z as determined by the board of directors”) in accordance with the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Section 8.24(a) recognizes that the Act itself may provide for a different quorum in certain specified situations. See sections 8.53(c)(1) and 8.55(b)(1).

Section 8.24 allows the articles of incorporation or bylaws to decrease the required quorum (but not below one-third) or to increase the quorum or the vote necessary to take action up to and including unanimity. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may also establish quorum or voting requirements with respect to directors elected by voting groups of shareholders pursuant to section 8.04. The options to increase the quorum and vote requirements might be used, for example, in closely held corporations where a greater degree of participation is thought appropriate or where a minority participant in the venture seeks to obtain a veto power over corporate action.

The phrase “when the vote is taken” in section 8.24(c) is designed to make clear that the board of directors may act only when a quorum is present. If directors leave during the course of a meeting, the board of directors may not act after the number of directors present is reduced to less than a quorum.

If a director who is present at a meeting wishes to object or abstain with respect to action taken by the board of directors or a committee, that director must make his or her position clear in one of the ways described in section 8.24(d). If objection is made in the form of a written dissent under clause (iii) of section 8.24(d), it may be transmitted by any form of delivery authorized by the definition of that term in section 1.40, including electronic transmission, if authorized by section 1.41. Section 8.24(d) serves the important purpose of bringing the position of the dissenting director clearly to the attention of the other directors. The provision that a director who is present is deemed to have assented unless an objection is noted also prevents a director from later seeking to avoid responsibility because of unexpressed doubts about the wisdom of the action taken.

Section 8.24(d) applies only to directors who are present at the meeting. Directors who are not present are not deemed to have assented to any action taken at the meeting in their absence.

North Carolina Commentary

This section is generally consistent with prior law but clarifies an ambiguity in former G.S. 55-28(d) by expressly requiring in subsection (c) that a quorum be present when the vote is taken, thus explicitly permitting directors to prevent further action by withdrawing from the meeting to eliminate a quorum.

This section varies from the Model Act in requiring in subsection (b) that a bylaw fixing a low quorum be “adopted by the shareholders.” For clarification, the word “files” was substituted in subdivision (d) (3) for the Model Act’s ambiguous “delivers.”

Supplemental North Carolina Commentary (2021)

Session Laws 2021-106, s. 3(a) includes amendments to conform to changes to the Model Act that clarify provisions regarding quorum and voting requirements applicable to the board of directors. The changes eliminate the use of the terms “fixed board size” and “variable-range size board,” and substitute a clearer formulation, in which the denominator for quorum and voting purposes would be the number of directors “specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.” The changes also address an apparent inconsistency that previously existed between G.S. 55-8-24(a), which provided that a quorum consists of a majority of the number of directors unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number, and G.S. 55-8-24(b), which limited the articles of incorporation or bylaws from establishing a quorum to be no fewer than one-third of the number of directors. The amendments to G.S. 55-8-24(a) clarify that the articles of incorporation or the bylaws may establish a quorum greater than or lesser than the statutory presumption of a majority of the number of directors, while G.S. 55-8-24(b) provides that the minimum quorum that may be set in the articles of incorporation or bylaws is one-third of the number of directors. The amendment to G.S. 55-8-24(a) also recognizes that other provisions of the North Carolina Business Corporation Act, such as G.S. 55-8-55(b)(1), provide for board of director actions to be taken by groups of directors that in number may not satisfy these quorum requirements. The change to G.S. 55-8-24(c) recognizes that certain provisions of the North Carolina Business Corporation Act, such as G.S. 55-8-55(b)(1) and

G.S. 55-9-04(c)

, specify different voting standards than the standard specified in G.S. 55-8-24(c).

§ 55-8-25.
Committees.

Unless this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more members of the board of directors to serve on the committee. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or the resolution of the board of directors designating the committee, a committee, by action of a majority of its members then in office when the action is taken, may create one or more subcommittees consisting of one or more members of the committee and delegate to the one or more subcommittees any or all of the powers and authority of the committee.

Unless this Chapter provides otherwise, the creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be approved by the greater of either of the following:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken.

The number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under

G.S. 55-8-24

.

(b1)

The creation and appointment of a committee pursuant to G.S. 55-7-44(b)(2) may be approved in the manner set forth in G.S. 55-7-44(b)(2).

G.S. 55-8-20

through

G.S. 55-8-24

apply both to committees and subcommittees of the board of directors and to their members.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the authority of the board of directors under

G.S. 55-8-01

.

A committee shall not, however, do any of the following:

Authorize or approve distributions, except according to a formula or method, or within limits, prescribed by the board of directors.

Approve or propose to shareholders action that this act requires be approved by shareholders.

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or on any of its committees.

Amend articles of incorporation pursuant to

G.S. 55-10-02

.

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws.

Approve a plan of merger not requiring shareholder approval.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee or subcommittee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in

G.S. 55-8-30

.

The board of directors may appoint one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee, or a subcommittee of the committee, during the member’s absence or disqualification.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 13; 1973, c. 1087, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2005-268, s. 10; 2007-385, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 9.

§ 55-8-26.
Submission of matters for shareholder vote.

A corporation may agree to submit a matter to a vote of its shareholders even if, after approving the matter, the board of directors determines it no longer recommends the matter.

History.

2013-153, s. 7.

OFFICIAL COMMENTS (2013)

Section 8.26 is intended to clarify that a corporation can enter into an agreement, such as a merger agreement, containing a force the vote provision. Section 8.26 is broader than some analogous state corporation law provisions and applies to several different provisions of the Model Act that require the directors to approve a matter before recommending that the shareholders vote to approve it. Under section 8.26, directors can agree to submit a matter to the shareholders for approval even if they later determine that they no longer recommend it. The provision is not intended to relieve the board of directors of its duty to consider carefully the proposed transaction and the interests of the shareholders.

§§ 55-8-27 through 55-8-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.